data/hungarian.aff
SFX E   0    ne           [^tk]                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX E   0    jünk         [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    jél          [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    jetek        [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    jenek        [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    jen          [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_SG_3]
SFX E   0    jek          [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    j            [^sztk]                   [SUBJ/IMPER_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    ettünk       rr                        [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    ettünk       [lnrz]d                   [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    ettünk       [ln]l                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    ettünk       [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t       [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    ettünk       [jdmn]z                   [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    ettünk       [gn]g                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    ettél        rr                        [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    ettél        [lnrz]d                   [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    ettél        [ln]l                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    ettél        [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t       [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    ettél        [jdmn]z                   [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    ettél        [gn]g                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    ettetek      rr                        [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    ettetek      [lnrz]d                   [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    ettetek      [ln]l                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    ettetek      [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t       [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    ettetek      [jdmn]z                   [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    ettetek      [gn]g                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    ettem        rr                        [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    ettem        [lnrz]d                   [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    ettem        [ln]l                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    ettem        [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t       [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    ettem        [jdmn]z                   [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    ettem        [gn]g                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    ettek        rr                        [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    ettek        [lnrz]d                   [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    ettek        [ln]l                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    ettek        [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t       [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    ettek        [jdmn]z                   [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    ettek        [gn]g                     [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    etek         rr                        [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    etek         [lnrz]d                   [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    etek         [ln]l                     [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    etek         [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    etek         [jdmn]z                   [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    etek         [gn]g                     [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    esz          rr                        [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    esz          [lnrz]d                   [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    esz          [ln]l                     [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    esz          [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    esz          [jdmn]z                   [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    esz          [gn]g                     [PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    enünk        rr                        [INF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enünk        [lnrz]d                   [INF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enünk        [ln]l                     [INF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enünk        [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [INF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enünk        [jdmn]z                   [INF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enünk        [gn]g                     [INF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enétek       rr                        [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    enétek       [lnrz]d                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    enétek       [ln]l                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    enétek       [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    enétek       [jdmn]z                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    enétek       [gn]g                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_2]
SFX E   0    enénk        rr                        [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enénk        [lnrz]d                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enénk        [ln]l                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enénk        [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enénk        [jdmn]z                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enénk        [gn]g                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_1]
SFX E   0    enének       rr                        [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    enének       [lnrz]d                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    enének       [ln]l                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    enének       [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    enének       [jdmn]z                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    enének       [gn]g                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    enél         rr                        [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    enél         [lnrz]d                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    enél         [ln]l                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    enél         [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    enél         [jdmn]z                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    enél         [gn]g                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_2]
SFX E   0    enék         rr                        [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    enék         [lnrz]d                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    enék         [ln]l                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    enék         [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    enék         [jdmn]z                   [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    enék         [gn]g                     [PRES_COND_INDEF_SG_1]
SFX E   0    eniük        rr                        [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniük        [lnrz]d                   [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniük        [ln]l                     [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniük        [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniük        [jdmn]z                   [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniük        [gn]g                     [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniök        rr                        [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniök        [lnrz]d                   [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniök        [ln]l                     [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniök        [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniök        [jdmn]z                   [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    eniök        [gn]g                     [INF_PL_3]
SFX E   0    enie         rr                        [INF_SG_3]
SFX E   0    enie         [lnrz]d                   [INF_SG_3]
SFX E   0    enie         [ln]l                     [INF_SG_3]
SFX E   0    enie         [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [INF_SG_3]
SFX E   0    enie         [jdmn]z                   [INF_SG_3]
SFX E   0    enie         [gn]g                     [INF_SG_3]
SFX E   0    eni          rr                        [ni_INFINITIVE_inf]
SFX E   0    eni          [lnrz]d                   [ni_INFINITIVE_inf]
SFX E   0    eni          [ln]l                     [ni_INFINITIVE_inf]
SFX E   0    eni          [jlmnrszáéíű]t            [ni_INFINITIVE_inf]
SFX E   0    eni          [jdmn]z                   [ni_INFINITIVE_inf]
SFX E   0    eni          [gn]g                     [ni_INFINITIVE_inf]
