data/hungarian.dic
ügyesedik/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
öntet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ízlelget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
érvénytelenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
építkezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ékeskedik/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
züllesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	zülleszt[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
zsebel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vérezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vizitel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vetkőztet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
vermel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
tüzesedik/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
törvénytelenít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
töltöget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
térdel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
tetvesedik/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
terjed/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
telepít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
süppedez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szüneteltet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
színtelenedik/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
számkivet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szerepeltet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szemtelenedik/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
szegez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
slisszel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
semmiz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
röppen/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ráég/Ş¤EŹ	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
reszteltet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
remeg/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
pöszít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
pomádéz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
petyegtet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
pellengérez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
nézdegél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
nyelet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	nyel[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
nehézkedik/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
méreget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
mericskél/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
mellesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
löttyed/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
lisztel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
lep/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
legeltet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
közművesít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
körít/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kísértet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	kísért[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
késel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
képeszt/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
krokettezik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kiikszel/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kettőztet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kepeszt/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
kegyelmez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
jelképez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ireg/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
ihlet/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hökkentet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	hökkent[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hihet/EeŹX	hisz[vrb]+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hemzseg/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
hangversenyez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
gyűröget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
gerjesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	gerjeszt[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
füllesztet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	fülleszt[vrb]+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
főzet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
fityeg/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
feled/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
eseget/ŞŚ¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
emelintet/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
egykézik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
dribliz/Ş¨Ś¤˘EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
csippent/ŞŚ¤EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
cselez/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
brekeg/Ş¤EŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
befellegzik/Ş¨Ś¤˘EeŹX	[vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}
